District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.54

Assessment of alcohol or drug abuse and treatment.

Any person convicted of violating sections § 50-2206.11, § 50-2206.12, § 50-2206.14, § 50-2206.16, § 50-2206.31, or § 50-2206.33 who has prior offense under sections § 50-2206.11, § 50-2206.12, § 50-2206.14, § 50-2206.16, § 50-2206.31, or § 50-2206.33, shall have his or her alcohol or drug abuse history assessed and a treatment program prescribed as appropriate.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3s
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.